Massachusetts, session 194th, H1617.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 209A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following subsection:-
(j) After a conviction or a change of plea and at sentencing in the Superior Court on
charges of:
(1) a felony which has as an element of the use, attempted use, or threatened use of
physical force against the person of another; or
(2) a misdemeanor or felony involving “abuse” as defined in section 1 or while a 209A
order was in effect against the defendant; or
(3) any of the following specific charges: (i) assault and battery on a family or household
member; (ii) assault and battery on a person 60 or older or a disabled person; (iii) assault with
intent to murder; (iv) attempt to murder; (v) strangulation or suffocation; (vi) assault and battery
of 2

causing serious bodily injury; (vii) assault and battery by means of a dangerous weapon; (viii)
assault and battery by means of a dangerous weapon causing serious bodily injury; (ix) mayhem;
(x) assault and battery; (xi) stalking; (xii) rape; (xiii) assault with intent to rape; (xiv)
kidnapping; or (xv) intimidation of a witness.
A judge in the Superior Court at the time of sentencing for crimes enumerated and
committed on a person who is family or a household member as defined in section 1, or a person
who is or was in a substantial dating relationship, and has an active order under this section, may
issue a permanent abuse prevention order at the request of a person who is or was in a substantial
dating relationship with the defendant or is a family or household member as defined in section 1
even if the original order was issued from the Boston Municipal Court, a District Court, or a
Probate Court and even if the family or household member is a minor. The order, as permitted
under section 2, may be issued without a further hearing date based on the facts of the case
which the Superior Court is sentencing the defendant at the request of the victim of violence so
long as the victim of violence already had an active protective order.
of 2